Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1415
Justification in property crimes.

Conduct involving the appropriation, seizure or destruction of, damage to, intrusion on or interference with property is justifiable under circumstances which would establish a defense of privilege in a civil action based thereon, unless:

(1) Sections 28-1406 to 28-1416 or the law defining the offense deals with the specific situation involved; or

(2) A legislative purpose to exclude the justification claimed otherwise plainly appears.

Laws 1972, LB 895, § 10;

R.R.S.1943, § 28-842, (1975).